Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-12,179
Related entity, defined.

Related entity means any entity which is a subsidiary or affiliated entity of the applicant or which has, as one of its purposes for existence, the financial support of the applicant.

Laws 2020, LB1107, § 95.